Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5022YC (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. STATE BOARD OF REGENTS ââ VEISHEA FEASIBILITY 1 STUDY. 2 1. The state board of regents shall conduct a study 3 regarding the feasibility of reintroducing VEISHEA, the 4 university-wide celebration that began in 1922 and was held 5 nearly annually until 2014, at Iowa state university. The 6 objectives of the study are to determine whether it is 7 practical and beneficial to reinstate VEISHEA. 8 2. The state board shall submit its findings and 9 recommendations in a report to the chairperson of the house 10 committee on higher education and the chairperson of the senate 11 committee on education prior to the November 2026 meeting of 12 the state board. 13 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 14 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 15